Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-123 Remedies. In enforcing
this article, the commissioner shall be entitled to the remedies provided for
in section 431:20-103(2), (3), and (4). [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2004, c
122, §79]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next